Wisconsin, session 2025, AB794.
do enact as follows:AB794,11Section 1. 102.07 (8) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB794,2,62102.07 (8) (a) Except as provided in pars. (b) and (bm) and sub. (8b), every 3independent contractor is, for the purpose of this chapter, an employee of any 4employer under this chapter for whom he or she is performing service in the course 5of the trade, business, profession or occupation of such employer at the time of the 6injury.AB794,27Section 2. 102.07 (8b) of the statutes is created to read:AB794,2,88102.07 (8b) (a) In this subsection:AB794,2,991. “Facility” means a health care facility.AB794,2,11102. “Health care facility” means a location that provides health care or related 11services.AB794,3,213. “Health care facility operator” means person that operates a health care 2facility.AB794,3,534. “Health care worker” means an individual who provides health care or 4directly-related services to patients. “Health care worker” includes professionals 5and individuals who provide services that do not require licensure.AB794,3,865. “Health care worker platform” means a person that operates or offers an 7electronic platform, system, or application through which health care workers may 8accept an offer to work one or more shifts at a health care facility.AB794,3,996. “Worker” means a health care worker.AB794,3,10107. “Worker platform” means a health care worker platform.AB794,3,1911(b) This subsection applies only to a work shift that a health care worker 12performs that the worker schedules or books through a health care worker platform, 13and this subsection may not be construed to affect the classification of a health care 14worker under any other circumstances. A health care worker is an independent 15contractor and is not an employee of a health care worker platform through which 16the health care worker schedules work shifts at a health care facility or an employee 17of the health care facility or the health care facility operator at which the health 18care worker performs a work shift the worker schedules through a health care 19worker platform if all of the following conditions are met:AB794,3,22201. The worker platform and the worker agree in writing that the worker is an 21independent contractor for all work shifts the worker schedules through the worker 22platform.AB794,3,24232. The worker platform allows a worker to determine whether to accept a work 24shift at a facility without requiring a worker to accept a minimum number of shifts.AB794,4,213. The worker platform allows a worker to agree in writing to the hourly rates 2offered or set by the facility or the worker platform.AB794,4,434. The worker platform does not penalize a worker for accepting or rejecting a 4work shift at a facility.AB794,4,655. The worker platform does not require the worker to be available to accept or 6fulfill a particular work shift during specific hours or on specific days.AB794,4,976. The worker platform does not restrict the worker from engaging in any 8other occupation or business, including health care work or health care-related 9work.AB794,4,12107. The worker platform does not require the worker to use specific equipment, 11tools, or other supplies during a work shift the worker schedules through the 12platform.AB794,4,15138. The worker platform does not prescribe or control the means and methods 14for the services performed by a worker during a work shift the worker schedules 15through the platform.AB794,4,17169. The agreement between the worker and the worker platform may be 17terminated by either party with or without cause.AB794,4,201810. The worker is responsible for remitting any federal, state, or local taxes on 19the worker’s earnings from work shifts the worker schedules through a worker 20platform.AB794,4,222111. The worker platform does not require a worker to enter into a noncompete 22agreement with the platform.AB794,5,22312. The worker platform does not require a worker or health care facility 1operator to pay any fee or compensation to the platform if a worker accepts an offer 2of permanent employment from a health care facility operator.AB794,5,7313. The worker platform does not restrict a worker from accepting work shifts 4through another platform or from a facility that does not offer work shifts on the 5platform. A worker platform may remove from the platform a worker who accepts 6overlapping work shifts on different worker platforms and later cancels one or more 7of those work shifts.AB794,5,10814. The worker platform maintains occupational accident insurance that 9applies to any work performed by a worker during a work shift the worker schedules 10through the platform.AB794,5,121115. The worker platform maintains general liability insurance and 12professional liability insurance.AB794,313Section 3. 104.013 of the statutes is created to read:AB794,5,1414104.013 Certain health care workers excluded. (1) In this section:AB794,5,1515(a) “Health care facility” has the meaning given in s. 102.07 (8b) (a) 2.AB794,5,1716(b) “Health care facility operator” has the meaning given in s. 102.07 (8b) (a) 173.AB794,5,1818(c) “Health care worker” has the meaning given in s. 102.07 (8b) (a) 4.AB794,5,2019(d) “Health care worker platform” has the meaning given in s. 102.07 (8b) (a) 205.AB794,6,321(2) For the purposes of this chapter, a health care worker is an independent 22contractor and is not an employee of a health care worker platform through which 23the health care worker schedules work shifts at a health care facility or an employee 24of the health care facility or the health care facility operator of the facility at which 1the health care worker performs a work shift the health care worker schedules 2through a health care worker platform if all of the conditions of s. 102.07 (8b) (b) are 3met. AB794,44Section 4. 108.02 (12) (cm) of the statutes is created to read:AB794,6,65108.02 (12) (cm) Paragraph (a) does not apply to a health care worker, as 6defined in s. 102.07 (8) (b) (a) 4., if all of the conditions of s. 102.07 (8b) (b) are met. AB794,57Section 5. 109.013 of the statutes is created to read:AB794,6,88109.013 Certain health care workers excluded. (1) In this section:AB794,6,99(a) “Health care facility” has the meaning given in s. 102.07 (8b) (a) 2.AB794,6,1110(b) “Health care facility operator” has the meaning given in s. 102.07 (8b) (a) 113.AB794,6,1212(c) “Health care worker” has the meaning given in s. 102.07 (8b) (a) 4.AB794,6,1413(d) “Health care worker platform” has the meaning given in s. 102.07 (8b) (a) 145.AB794,6,2115(2) For the purposes of this chapter, a health care worker is an independent 16contractor and is not an employee of a health care worker platform through which 17the health care worker schedules work shifts at a health care facility or an employee 18of the health care facility or the health care facility operator of the facility at which 19the health care worker performs a work shift the health care worker schedules 20through a health care worker platform if all of the conditions of s. 102.07 (8b) (b) are 21met. AB794,6,2222